Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3776.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.03, subdivision 44, is amended to read: Subd. 44. Sexual orientation. "Sexual orientation" means to whom someone is, or is perceived of as being, emotionally, physically, or sexually attracted to based on sex or gender identity. A person may be attracted to men, women, both, neither, or to people who are genderqueer, androgynous, or have other gender identities.new text begin Sexual orientation does not include a physical or sexual attraction to children by an adult.new text end